Missouri, session 2026, HB2806.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 227.855, to read as follows:
227.855. 1. The department of transportation shall place a sign at the city limits
of the hometown, or other suitable location determined at the discretion of the
department based on the available right of way, coordination with any other existing
traffic control devices, and impacts on roadway safety, of any Missouri resident who is a
recipient of the Congressional Medal of Honor. For purposes of this section,
"hometown" means the city, town, or village in which the recipient resided for the
majority of the recipient's lifetime. Only one hometown shall be designated per
recipient and signs shall appear on only one route through the recipient's hometown.
The signs shall be paid for, erected, and maintained by the department of transportation
by appropriation from the Missouri medal of honor recipients fund established under
section 226.925.
2. The signs shall feature the words "Medal of Honor Recipient", the name of
the recipient, and the year in which such person received the award. The overall design
of the sign, including size, color, and lettering, shall be determined by the department
based on available space in the right of way and to conform with the guidelines provided
in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2806 2
3. The department of transportation may promulgate rules and regulations to
implement and administer the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated
in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔